Hawaii, session 2026, SB199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Native Hawaiian culture is the foundation of all aspects of life in Hawaii.  This culture influences Hawaii's government, businesses, tourism industry, families, and individuals.  The legislature recognizes that despite the prevalence of this cultural foundation, there are no public spaces dedicated to the practice and perpetuation of Hawaiian culture. The legislature believes that Native Hawaiian cultural centers may serve as places where residents and visitors may learn about Hawaiian culture, history, tradition, and practices. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require the office of Hawaiian affairs to establish and maintain no fewer than Native Hawaiian cultural centers within the State; (2)  Require the office of Hawaiian affairs to construct a cultural center on Oahu by 2040, with the understanding that construction shall proceed as quickly as possible; (3)  Require the office of Hawaiian affairs to submit reports to the legislature regarding the office's compliance with this Act; and (4)  Appropriate moneys for the planning and design of the first Native Hawaiian cultural center. SECTION 2. Chapter 10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§10-    Native Hawaiian cultural centers; statewide.  (a)  No later than           , the office of Hawaiian affairs shall establish and maintain no fewer than Native  Hawaiian cultural centers within the State. (b)  Each Native Hawaiian cultural center shall: (1)  Focus on elevating and uplifting the Native Hawaiian people; (2)  Be dedicated to Hawaiian culture and history, emphasizing the particular geographic location of the center; (3)  Contain both static and interactive displays and exhibits; (4)  Offer classes in Hawaiian chanting, dancing, music, language, and other cultural practices on a regular, ongoing basis; and (5)  Serve as a place where the public may gather and hold celebrations." SECTION 3. The office of Hawaiian affairs shall construct one cultural center on Oahu by 2040, with the understanding that construction shall proceed as quickly as possible. SECTION 4. No later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2028, the board of trustees of the office of Hawaiian affairs shall submit to the legislature reports that include: (1)  The status of the office's compliance with this Act; (2)  The estimated costs of the planning, design, and construction of Native Hawaiian cultural centers; (3)  Any proposed legislation; and (4)  Any other relevant information. SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the planning and design of one Native Hawaiian cultural center. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of Hawaiian affairs for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.